Windows-l10n-central/da/extensions/spellcheck/hunspell/da.dic
aktionær/70,73,7,976,941,947
aldersdiskrimination/193,70,976
a-mol/190,976
antabus/737,70,976,941,947
antonym/70,962,366
apokryf/1106,70,366
arbejdsro/193,70,976
assists'/976
autoudlejning/193,70,976,939,947
av-udstyr/70,252,10,976
baderum/70,254,976,939,947
bagtøj/194,70,976
bal/70,9,976,941,947
bane/190,976
barok/1106,70,366
behovsorienteret/70,1062
beslutsom/1025,366,976
beværter/20,7,70,976,941,947
bindegal/70,962,366
bjergsom/1025,366,976
bladselleri/70,7,252,976
blokade/70,73,7,976,941,947
blokpolitisk/917,976
blødhed/193,70,976
bobspil/70,254,976
bollet/70,1062
brakvand/194,70,976,939,947
brok/190,976
brydsom/1025,366,976
bud/70,254,976,941,947
bulder/194,70,976,941,947
bums/70,252,10,976
bøs/70,962,366
chaiselong/70,73,7,976
croissant/70,73,7,976,941,947
cykelstel/70,254,976
DDR-mark/70,7,252,976
D-dur/190,976
dechifrering/70,73,7,976,939,947
decideret/70,1062
despekt/193,70,976
donor/70,73,7,976,941,947
dopamin/194,70,976,941,947
drillevorn/70,962,366
dværghønes/976
dæk/70,254,976,941,947
dødskøn/1106,70,366
efterkrigsår/70,252,10,976
eftersmæk/70,254,976
embedsstanden/190,976
endeløs/70,962,366
ensartet/70,1062
ensom/1025,366,976
evakostume/194,70,976
fagforeningstvang/193,70,976
fakkel/815,822,70,944,941,947
fastlandssokler/976
feature/70,7,252,976,941,947
filistrøs/70,962,366
filstruktur/70,73,7,976,941,947
fjernstyret/70,1062
flaskegrøn/1106,70,366
flus/190,976
flåd/70,254,976,940,947
f-ord/70,252,10,976
fordampning/70,73,7,976,939,947
fordærv/194,70,976
forhøjet/70,1062
fornuftstridigts/976
forudindtagethed/193,70,976
forvirret/70,1062
fragil/70,962,366
frygtsom/1025,366,976
future/70,7,252,976
færdigudviklet/70,1062
fæstningsanlæg/70,254,976
førstningen/190,976
gangtøj/194,70,976
gavn/190,976,941,947
geléen/976
gennemtør/1106,70,366
genuin/70,962,366
genvej/20,7,70,976,939,947
glemsom/1025,366,976
golf/193,70,976
grenhold/70,252,10,976
gålæg/70,254,976
halsløs/70,962,366
halvsekstiden/190,976
hatchback/70,73,7,976
havsalt/194,70,976
helt/70,7,252,976,940,947
heteroseksuel/1106,70,366
hittepåsom/1025,366,976
hole-in-one/190,976,466
hore/6,143,148,941,947
hormonal/70,962,366
humanitet/193,70,976
hundebid/70,254,976
hvidhåret/70,1062
hvilsom/1025,366,976
hælde/6,143,148,941,947
håndstrøgneste/976
idvande/194,70,976
ildrød/70,962,366
instrumentel/1106,70,366
intravenøs/70,962,366
is/70,7,252,976,941,947
jagen/190,976
job/70,254,976,941,947
julepynt/193,70,976
kakadue/70,73,7,976,941,947
kampagne/70,73,7,976,941,947
kapslet/70,1062
karneval/70,9,976,939,947
klynkeri/194,70,976
knaldgrøn/1106,70,366
knæk/70,254,976,941,947
kog/190,976
kontor/70,10,73,976,941,947
kopperne/976
korngul/70,962,366
korstog/70,252,10,976,939,947
kraftoverføring/193,70,976
krap/1106,70,366
kviksølv/194,70,976,941,947
kvinde/70,73,7,976,941,947
kølet/70,1062
langsom/1025,366,976
lavstatusjob/70,254,976
ledorm/20,7,70,976
line/6,143,148,941,947
livshjul/70,252,10,976
livsnødvendighed/193,70,976
log-in/190,976
lufttom/1106,70,366
lysegul/70,962,366
læder/194,70,976,941,947
mana/190,976,941,947
manierisme/193,70,976
matadorspil/70,254,976
meddelsom/1025,366,976
meter/70,7,252,976,941,947
militærpoliti/194,70,976
miljømyndighed/193,70,976
ministeriel/1106,70,366
moderdyr/70,252,10,976
mopset/70,1062
muk/190,976
muldyr/70,252,10,976,941,947
mærkbar/70,962,366
navneforbud/70,254,976
nellike/70,73,7,976,941,947
nyopdagelse/193,70,976
nænsom/1025,366,976
nærpoliti/194,70,976
oblik/1106,70,366
olie/70,73,7,976,941,947
olympier/20,7,70,976
opblussen/190,976
ophøjet/70,1062
opmærksom/1025,366,976
overdæk/70,254,976
overlydsfly/70,252,10,976
pensel/815,822,70,944,941,947
permanens/193,70,976
perspektivløs/70,962,366
pigtrådsmusik/737,70,976
pillearbejde/194,70,976
politiseren/190,976
positionel/1106,70,366
pot/46,70,976,941,947
puslerum/70,254,976
påvirket/70,1062
receptionist/70,73,7,976
reciprok/1106,70,366
regntøj/194,70,976
rekordlav/70,962,366
rentetab/70,252,10,976
replik/46,70,976,941,947
retskraft/193,70,976
ruskomsnusk/190,976
rytteri/70,10,73,976,941,947
rædsom/1025,366,976
rålam/70,254,976
samisk/917,976
sandpapir/194,70,976,941,947
seminarieuddannet/70,1062
sensationalisme/193,70,976
sensationel/1106,70,366
skadesløs/70,962,366,941,947
skiftespor/70,252,10,976
skilsmisse/70,73,7,976,941,947
skrabsammen/190,976
skrat/70,254,976,941,947
skulder/115,70,85,976,941,947
skønskriveri/194,70,976
skånsom/1025,366,976
smal/1106,70,366
solbleget/70,1062
sparsom/1025,366,976
specialtilbud/70,254,976
specialviden/190,976
splitscreen/193,70,976
sporbar/70,962,366
springtur/20,7,70,976
spænd/70,252,10,976
stangtøj/194,70,976
statsråd/194,70,976,939,947
status/46,70,976,941,947
stram/1106,70,366
sut/70,254,976
syret/70,1062
sær/70,962,366
søren/190,976
søvnløshed/193,70,976
tagetes/70,7,252,976
taklegarn/194,70,976
takt/70,73,7,976,941,947
telegram/70,9,976,941,947
toddyglas/70,254,976
toiletartiklen/976
tommetyk/1106,70,366
trælsom/1025,366,976
tvesindet/70,1062
tydelighed/193,70,976
tyrannosaurus/190,976
tæppe/70,10,73,976,941,947
tør/1106,70,366
uagtsom/1025,366,976
udendørsliv/70,252,10,976
udetøj/194,70,976
udslusning/70,73,7,976,939,947
uforarbejdet/70,1062
ufølsom/1025,366,976
ugraciøs/70,962,366
uopfindsom/1025,366,976
urationel/1106,70,366
uskrællet/70,1062
utilpashed/193,70,976
utålsom/1025,366,976
varsom/1025,366,976
venstresnoet/70,1062
versemåls/976
vildrede/190,976
vokseværk/194,70,976
vrid/70,254,976,940,947
vækst/70,73,7,976,941,947
værdifri/70,962,366
værgemål/70,252,10,976,939,947
zodiakallys/70,252,10,976
æblegrøn/1106,70,366
æggestand/193,70,976
